California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(ii) A county may approve or deny the application after the investigation or administrative action has concluded, and the county confirms the applicant is still eligible to apply for approval and does not pose a health and safety risk to children or nonminor dependents.

(b) A county may deny a resource family’s request to transfer
 approval to a county for any of the reasons specified in Section 16519.61. If the county denies a resource family’s request, the resource family shall be entitled to a hearing, as specified in Section 16519.6.

(c) Resource family approval by a licensed foster family agency pursuant to Section 1517 or 1517.5 of the Health and Safety Code shall be forfeited by operation of law upon the transfer of the resource family approval to a county in accordance with this section.

(d) A resource family approved pursuant to this section shall comply with the written directives or regulations adopted pursuant to Section 16519.5 and comply with other applicable federal and state laws in order to maintain approval.

(e) Effective October 1, 2024, or
 upon the effective date of the act that added this subdivision, whichever is later, the rate paid on behalf of a child or nonminor dependent to an approved resource family approved by a licensed foster family agency that has applied to transfer their approval to a county pursuant to this section shall be the rate most recently established for the child or nonminor dependent pursuant to Section 11461. Upon approval of the resource family by the county, the rate may be adjusted based on the needs of the child, consistent with guidance provided by the department.

(f) (1) Effective October 1, 2024, or upon the effective date of the act that added this subdivision, whichever is later, the department may temporarily waive provisions of this section to facilitate the expedient transfer of an approval of a resource family that was approved by a licensed foster family agency pursuant to Section 1517 or 1517.5 of the Health and
 Safety Code to a county. Waivers pursuant to this subdivision shall not include waivers of background check requirements.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that, as part of this process, the department provide, on a timely basis, any information and documentation related to pending investigations or administrative actions against the resource family to the county to facilitate decisions regarding approval of the resource family.

(3) This subdivision shall be inoperative on January 1, 2027.

(g) For purposes of
 this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Department” means the State Department of Social Services.

(2) “County” means a county child welfare or probation department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 403, Sec. 3.   (AB 2496)   Effective September 22, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

16519.59.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, contracts or grants awarded for purposes of this article shall be exempt from the personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, contracts or grants awarded for purposes of this article shall be exempt from the Public Contract Code and the State Contracting Manual, and shall not be subject to the approval of the Department of General Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 732, Sec. 107.   (AB 404)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

16519.6.

(a) A hearing conducted pursuant to Section 16519.5 shall be conducted in accordance with the requirements of this section and the written directives or regulations adopted pursuant to Section 16519.5.

(b) For a resource family hearing held at the department’s State Hearings Division, the procedures set forth in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 10950) of Part 2 shall apply, except as otherwise provided in this section.

(c) (1) For a resource family hearing held at the Office of Administrative Hearings, the procedures set forth in the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section
 11370) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) shall apply, except as otherwise provided in this article.

(2) For purposes of the administrative action procedures set forth in this article, “agency” means a county or the department according to the authority to take action provided in subdivisions (f) and (g) of Section 16519.5, except that “agency” shall mean the department for purposes of a decision or a posthearing procedure, as provided in Sections 11517 to 11522, inclusive, of the Government Code.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding the time to appeal set forth in Section 10951 of this code and Section 1558 of the Health and Safety Code, an applicant for approval or for a criminal record exemption may file a written appeal within 90 days of service of a
 notice of action, and a resource family, excluded individual, or individual who is the subject of a criminal record exemption rescission may file a written appeal within 25 days of service of a notice of action or exclusion order.

(2) Pursuant to Section 1013 of the Code of Civil Procedure, if the notice of action or exclusion order is served by mail, the time to respond shall be extended five days.

(3) If different appeal timelines apply to a matter as a result of multiple actions filed against a respondent, the following shall apply:

(A) A county or the department, as applicable, shall accept an appeal to one action as an appeal to all of the actions against the same respondent, if requested to do so by the
 respondent.

(B) If an action for rescission of approval, criminal record exemption rescission, or exclusion includes an action for application denial, the applicable appeal timeline for a rescission of approval, criminal record exemption rescission, or exclusion specified in paragraph (1) shall also apply to the action for application denial.

(4) This section does not impede or extend jurisdiction as set forth in the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11370) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(e) (1) Notwithstanding Section 10951, and except as provided in subdivision (m), a county’s action shall be final, or for matters set before the
 State Hearings Division, an appeal shall be subject to dismissal, if the resource family, applicant, excluded individual, or individual who is the subject of a criminal record exemption denial or rescission does not file an appeal to the notice of action or exclusion order within the prescribed time, withdraws the appeal, or fails to appear at the hearing without good cause.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a resource family, applicant, excluded individual, or individual who is the subject of a criminal record exemption denial or rescission shall be entitled to a hearing pursuant to Section 16519.5 if they file the appeal no more than 30 calendar days after the due date for the appeal, as specified in subdivision (d), and the person provides good cause for the late filing of the appeal. Good cause shall be determined by the department in an
 administrative review procedure set forth in the written directives or regulations adopted pursuant to Section 16519.5. The department shall not grant a late appeal for good cause if the appeal is filed more than 30 calendar days after the due date for the appeal, as specified in subdivision (d).

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, the following definitions apply:

(A) “Good cause” for the late filing of an appeal means a substantial and compelling reason beyond the party’s control, considering the length of the delay, the diligence of the party filing the appeal, and the potential prejudice to the other party.

(B) “Good cause” for failure to appear at the hearing shall be as defined by the department in the written
 directives or regulations adopted pursuant to Section 16519.5.

(C) The inability of a person to understand an adequate and language-compliant notice, in and of itself, does not constitute good cause.

(4) This section does not preclude the application of the principles of equity jurisdiction as otherwise provided by law.

(f) Except as provided in subdivisions (g) and (h), and notwithstanding Section 10952, a hearing under this section, notwithstanding any time waiver, shall be held within 90 days following the receipt of a timely appeal for matters to be set before the State Hearings Division or within 90 days following the receipt of a timely notice of defense for matters to be set before the Office of
 Administrative Hearings, unless a continuance or postponement of the hearing is granted for good cause.

(g) (1) The department may exclude a resource family parent, applicant, or other individual from presence in any resource family home, from employment in, presence in, and contact with clients of, any facility licensed by the department or certified or approved by a licensed foster family agency, and from holding the position of member of the board of directors, executive director, or officer of the licensee of any facility licensed by the department, for any of the reasons set forth in Section 16519.61.

(2) The department may issue an exclusion order requiring the immediate removal of an individual if, in the opinion of the department, the action is necessary to
 protect a child from physical or mental abuse, abandonment, or any other substantial threat to the child’s health or safety. If the department has issued an immediate exclusion order, the timelines for the service of an accusation, conducting a hearing, and for a final determination set forth in Section 1558 of the Health and Safety Code shall apply, unless a continuance of the hearing is granted for good cause.

(3) A resource family’s failure to comply with the department’s exclusion order after being notified of the order shall be grounds for taking action against the resource family’s approval pursuant to Section 16519.61.

(4) An exclusion order that was effective prior to the implementation of the resource family approval program and conversion of licensed foster family homes
 and certified family homes to resource families shall be deemed to exclude the individual from presence in any resource family home.

(5) (A) An exclusion shall be for the remainder of the excluded person’s life, unless otherwise ordered by the department, or as prescribed in Section 1558.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) Pursuant to Section 11522 of the Government Code, the excluded individual may petition for reinstatement to the department after one year has elapsed from the effective date of an exclusion order that was not appealed or the effective date of a decision and order by the department upholding an exclusion order. The department shall provide the excluded person a copy of Section 11522 of the Government Code with the exclusion order and
 decision and order.

(C) A temporary exclusion of an individual following a county’s denial of an application for resource family approval, rescission of approval, or denial or rescission of a criminal record exemption, shall only be imposed as set forth in the written directives or regulations adopted by the department pursuant to Section 16519.5.

(6) For purposes of this subdivision, a “facility licensed by the department” means a facility licensed pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1500) of, Chapter 3.01 (commencing with Section 1568.01) of, Chapter 3.2 (commencing with Section 1569) of, Chapter 3.3 (commencing with Section 1570) of, Chapter 3.4 (commencing with Section 1596.70) of, Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 1596.90) of, or Chapter 3.6 (commencing with
 Section 1597.30) of, Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(h) If a county or the department has issued a temporary suspension order, the hearing shall be held within 30 days following the receipt of a timely appeal for matters to be set before the State Hearings Division, or within 30 days following the receipt of a timely notice of defense for matters to be set before the Office of Administrative Hearings. The temporary suspension order shall remain in effect until the time the hearing is completed and the department has made a final determination on the merits. However, the temporary suspension order shall be deemed vacated if the department fails to make a final determination on the merits within 30 days after receipt of the proposed decision by the county or department.

(i) A
 county and the department may coordinate the filing of actions, file consolidated pleadings, or file a motion to consolidate multiple actions if a matter involves both a county and department action.

(j) A resource family, applicant, excluded individual, or individual who is the subject of a criminal record exemption denial or rescission who files an appeal to a notice of action or exclusion order pursuant to this section shall, as part of the appeal, provide their current mailing address. The resource family, applicant, or individual who is the subject of a criminal record exemption denial or rescission shall subsequently notify the county, and the excluded individual shall notify the department, in writing of any change in mailing address, until the hearing process has been completed or terminated.

(k) Service by mail of a notice or other writing on a resource family, applicant, excluded individual, or individual who is the subject of a criminal record exemption denial or rescission in a procedure pursuant to this section is effective if served to the last mailing address on file with the county or department. Service of a notice of action shall be by personal service or by first-class mail, and service of an exclusion order shall be by personal service or registered mail. If the last day for performance of any required action falls on a holiday, then the period shall be extended to the next day which is not a holiday.

(l) In all proceedings conducted in accordance with this section, the burden of proof on the department or county shall be by a preponderance of the evidence.

(m) (1) A county or the department may institute or continue an administrative proceeding against a resource family, applicant, or individual who is the subject of a criminal record exemption denial or rescission upon any ground provided by this section or Section 16519.61, enter an order denying an application or rescinding the approval of a resource family, exclude an individual, issue a temporary suspension order, or otherwise take disciplinary action against a resource family, applicant, or individual who is the subject of a criminal record exemption denial or rescission notwithstanding any resignation, withdrawal, forfeiture, surrender of approval, or denial or rescission of the approval by a foster family agency.

(2) The department may institute or
 continue an administrative proceeding against an excluded individual upon any ground provided by this section or Section 16519.61, enter an order to exclude an individual, or otherwise take disciplinary action against an excluded individual, notwithstanding any resignation, withdrawal, forfeiture, surrender of approval, or denial or rescission of the approval by a foster family agency.

(n) (1) Notwithstanding Sections 11425.10 and 11425.20 of the Government Code, a proceeding conducted pursuant to this section shall be confidential and not open to the public in order to preserve the confidential information of a child or resource family consistent with the confidentiality requirements in Sections 827, 10850, and 16519.55 of this code, Section 1536 of the Health and Safety Code, and Section 11167.5 of the Penal Code. Notwithstanding
 this requirement, an administrative law judge may admit persons deemed to have a direct and legitimate interest in the particular case or the work of the court on a case-by-case basis and with any admonishments, limitations, and protective orders as may be necessary to preserve the confidential nature of the proceedings.

(2) Except as otherwise required by law, in any writ of mandate proceeding related to an issue arising out of this article, the name, identifying information, or confidential information of a child as described in Sections 827, 10850, and 16519.55, and Section 11167.5 of the Penal Code, shall not be disclosed in a public document and a protective order shall be issued by the court in order to protect the confidential information of a child.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 288, Sec. 6.   (AB 1283)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

16519.61.

A county or the department may deny a resource family application or rescind the approval of a resource family, and the department may exclude an individual from any resource family home, for any of the following reasons:

(a) Violation of Section 16519.5, the written directives or regulations adopted pursuant to Section 16519.5, or any applicable law.

(b) Aiding, abetting, or permitting the violation of Section 16519.5, the written directives or regulations adopted pursuant to Section 16519.5, or any applicable law.

(c) Conduct that poses a risk or threat to the health and safety,
 protection, or well-being of a child, another individual, or the people of the State of California.

(d) The conviction of the resource family applicant, parent, or associated individual at any time before or during their approval of a crime described in Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code.

(e) Engaging in acts of financial malfeasance, including, but not limited to, improper use or embezzlement of the money or property of a child, fraudulent appropriation for personal gain of money or property, or willful or negligent failure to provide services.

(f) Any other reason specified in the written directives or regulations adopted pursuant to Section 16519.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 226, Sec. 3.   (SB 407)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

16519.62.

(a) The out-of-court statements of a child under 12 years of age who is the subject or victim of an allegation at issue constitutes admissible evidence at an administrative hearing conducted pursuant to this article. The out-of-court statement may provide the sole basis for a finding of fact if the proponent of the statement provided the statement to all parties prior to the hearing and the adjudicator finds that the time, content, and circumstances of the
 statement provide sufficient indicia of reliability. However, the out-of-court statement shall not be admissible if an objecting party establishes that the statement is unreliable because it was the product of fraud, deceit, or undue influence.

(b) This section shall not be construed to limit the right of any party to the administrative hearing to subpoena a witness whose statement is admitted as evidence or to introduce admissible evidence relevant to the weight of the hearsay evidence or the credibility of the hearsay declarant.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 612, Sec. 125.   (AB 1997)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

16519.63.

(a) An administrative law judge conducting a hearing pursuant to this article may permit the testimony of a child witness or a similarly vulnerable witness, including, but not limited to, a witness who is intellectually disabled, to be taken outside the presence of the respondent if all of the following conditions exist:

(1) The administrative law judge determines that taking the testimony of the witness outside the presence of the respondent is necessary to ensure truthful testimony.

(2) The witness is likely to be intimidated by the presence of the respondent.

(3) The witness is afraid to testify in front of the respondent.

(b) If the testimony of a witness is taken outside of the presence of the respondent, the county, or the department in an exclusion action, shall provide for the use of one-way closed-circuit television or video so the respondent can observe the witness’ testimony. Nothing in this section shall limit a respondent’s right to cross-examine the witness.

(c) The administrative law judge presiding over a hearing in which testimony is taken pursuant to this section may clear the hearing room of any person in order to protect a witness from intimidation or other harm, taking into account the rights of all persons.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 732, Sec. 110.   (AB 404)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

16519.64.

(a) In any administrative proceeding conducted pursuant to this article in which a child or other minor is the victim in an allegation of inappropriate sexual conduct, evidence of specific instances of the victim’s sexual conduct with individuals other than the alleged perpetrator is subject to all of the following limitations:

(1) The evidence is not discoverable unless it is to be offered at an administrative proceeding to attack the credibility of the victim as provided for in subdivision (b). This paragraph is intended only to limit the scope of discovery and is not intended to affect the methods of discovery authorized by statute.

(2) The evidence is not admissible at the administrative proceeding unless offered to attack the credibility of the victim as provided for in subdivision (b).

(3) Reputation or opinion evidence regarding the sexual behavior of the victim is not admissible for any purpose.

(b) Evidence of specific instances of a victim’s sexual conduct with individuals other than the alleged perpetrator is presumed inadmissible absent an offer of proof establishing its relevance and reliability and that its probative value is not substantially outweighed by the probability that its admission will create substantial danger of undue prejudice or confuse the issues.

(c) As used in
 this section, “victim” means a person who claims to have been subjected to inappropriate sexual conduct by an alleged perpetrator, including, but not limited to, a person who is an adult at the time of hearing but was under 18 years of age at the time of the alleged inappropriate sexual conduct.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 732, Sec. 111.   (AB 404)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

16519.65.

(a) For matters set before the State Hearings Division, the county or respondent may file a request with the department for a rehearing within 30 days after receiving the decision of the department that is a proposed decision of an administrative law judge adopted by the department as a final decision and order, a final decision rendered by an administrative law judge, or a decision issued by the department. The department shall grant or deny the request no later than the 90th business day after the request is made. The remaining provisions of Section 10960 shall apply to the rehearing request.

(b) If the department grants the request, the rehearing shall be conducted
 in accordance with Section 16519.6 and following.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 732, Sec. 112.   (AB 404)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

16519.7.

The training requirements of subparagraph (I) of paragraph (13) of subdivision (g) of Section 16519.5 shall include training on the importance of the caregiver’s role in education, educational protections specific to foster youth under state and federal law, and the rights and obligations of caregivers to access and maintain educational and health information, including the requirements under Sections 49069.3, 49076, and 56055 of the Education Code and Section 16010 of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 829, Sec. 12.   (SB 233)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Miscellaneous Provisions [16520. - 16521.8.]

16520.

The Legislature recognizes that wards and dependent children share many characteristics, often have similar family histories, and often require similar services such as out-of-home placement. The Legislature also recognizes that while there are similarities in the characteristics and service needs of the ward and dependent populations, there are also significant differences, the first being that the wards have been found responsible for committing offenses. Given this difference, the Legislature deems it imperative that placement agencies give special
 consideration when placing wards to factors which are not as significant when placing dependent children, including the effect on, including safety of, the community in which the out-of-home placement facility is located. However, the Legislature also acknowledges that for some wards, separate from the issue of accountability and punishment with regard to the offense, after satisfying the orders of the court with regard to the offense, placement in the out-of-home care system, with board and care funded through the Aid to Families with Dependent Children-Foster Care program, is appropriate and in their best interest.

In order to ensure that wards in the out-of-home care system, with board and care funded through the Aid to Families with Dependent Children-Foster Care program, receive appropriate services, and to ensure that applicable federal and state statutory requirements are met, it is the intent of the Legislature that the State Department of Social Services,
 regulate and monitor these placement activities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1089, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

16521.

The State Department of Social Services, in consultation with representatives of local probation departments, foster care providers, and other interested parties, shall review federal and state statutes, federal requirements, and state regulations pertaining to the placement of children whose board and care is funded through the Aid to Families with Dependent Children-Foster Care program, and shall by January 1, 1995, develop regulations which identify specific initial and ongoing placement activities which must be performed by the probation department to ensure
 the needs of wards in placement whose board and care is funded through the Aid to Families with Dependent Children-Foster Care program are met.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1089, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

16521.3.

(a) The Department of General Services and all other affected state agencies shall cooperate with the State Department of Social Services and the California Health and Human Services Agency Data Center to expedite and achieve timely completion and review of the Technical Architecture Alternatives Analysis Plan and all procurements related to child welfare services.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 11040 of the Government Code, the State Department of Social Services may obtain
 outside legal counsel to assist in negotiations for automation contracts related to child welfare services.

(c) The State Department of Social Services shall consult with stakeholders, including the County Welfare Directors Association, during the development of procurement and automation strategies related to child welfare services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 229, Sec. 58.5.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

16521.5.

(a) A foster care provider, in consultation with the county case manager, shall be responsible for ensuring that adolescents, including nonminor dependents, as described in subdivision (v) of Section 11400, who remain in long-term foster care, as defined by the department, receive age-appropriate pregnancy prevention information to the extent state and county resources are provided.

(b) A foster care provider, in consultation with the county case manager, shall be responsible for ensuring that a foster youth or nonminor dependent is provided with appropriate referrals to health services when the foster youth either reaches 18 years of age or the nonminor dependent exits foster care, and to the extent county and state resources are provided.

(c) As part of the home study process, the prospective foster care provider shall notify the county if the provider objects to participating in adolescent pregnancy prevention training or the dissemination of information pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b). A licensed foster care provider shall notify the county if the provider objects to participation. If the provider objects, the county case manager shall assume this responsibility.

(d) Subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) shall not take effect until the department, in consultation with the workgroup, develops guidelines that describe the duties and responsibilities of foster care providers and county case managers in delivering pregnancy prevention services and information.

(e) (1) The department, in consultation with the State Department of Health
 Care Services, shall convene a working group for the purpose of developing a pregnancy prevention plan that will effectively address the needs of adolescent male and female foster youth. The workgroup shall meet not more than three times and thereafter shall provide consultation to the department upon request.

(2) The working group shall include representatives from the California Youth Connection, the Foster Parent’s Association, group home provider associations, the County Welfare Director’s Association, providers of teen pregnancy prevention programs, a foster care caseworker, an expert in pregnancy prevention curricula, a representative of the Independent Living Program, and an adolescent health professional.

(f) The plan required pursuant to subdivision (e) shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Effective strategies and programs for preteen and older teen foster youth and nonminor dependents.

(2) The role of foster care and group home care providers.

(3) The role of the assigned case management worker.

(4) How to involve foster youth and nonminor peers.

(5) Selecting and providing appropriate materials to educate foster youth and nonminors in family life education.

(6) The training of foster care and group home care providers and, when necessary, county case managers in adolescent pregnancy prevention.

(g) Counties currently mandating foster care provider training shall be encouraged to include the
 pregnancy prevention curricula guidelines and educational materials that may be developed by the workgroup pursuant to subdivision (f).

(h) In order to train case management workers and foster care providers, the department shall develop a curriculum that is consistent with, and in addition to, the pregnancy prevention plan and the curricula guidelines and educational materials developed by the workgroup pursuant to subdivisions (e) and (f).

(i) The curriculum created pursuant to subdivision (h) shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) The rights of youth and nonminor dependents in foster care to sexual and reproductive health care and information, to confidentiality of sensitive health information, and the reasonable and prudent parent standard.

(2) How to document sensitive health information, including, but not limited to, sexual and reproductive health issues, in a case plan.

(3) The duties and responsibilities of the assigned case management worker and the foster care provider in ensuring youth and nonminor dependents in foster care can obtain sexual and reproductive health services and information.

(4) Guidance about how to engage and talk with youth and nonminor dependents about healthy sexual development and reproductive and sexual health in a manner that is medically accurate, developmentally and age appropriate, trauma informed, and strengths based.

(5) Information about current contraception methods and how to select and provide appropriate referral resources and materials for information
 and service delivery.

(j) (1) Subject to an appropriation for this purpose, the department shall compile and report annual performance and outcome data on the implementation of sexual and reproductive health training and education and the availability and use of sexual and reproductive health care services.

(A) Performance data shall include the total number and rate of all of the following:

(i) County social workers and probation officers who have received the information described in subdivision (i) through a training program described in Section 16206.

(ii) Judges who have received the information described in subdivision (i) through a training program described in Section 304.7.

(iii) Group home administrators who have received the information described in subdivision (i) through a training described in subdivision (c) of Section 1522.41 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) (i) Outcome data shall include integrated data drawn from data maintained by the State Department of Social Services, the State Department of Health Care Services, and the State Department of Public Health. The categories included in the outcome data, as well as the specific indicators used within each category, shall be determined in consultation with the work group convened pursuant to subdivision (e) and shall include, but not be limited to, those categories listed in clause (ii). Outcome indicators used within each category may include, but are not limited to, measures found in the Core Set of Children’s Health Care Quality Measure for Medicaid and CHIP (Child Core
 Set), and the Healthcare Effectiveness Data and Information Set (HEDIS), or measures developed using Medi-Cal, Family PACT, and other administrative and claims data codes.

(ii) Categories of outcome data shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(I) The total number and rate of youth who gave birth, the number of live births, and the number of live births weighing less than 2,500 grams, such as indicator National Quality Forum (NQF) 1382 from the Child Core Set.

(II) Maternal health outcomes for youth, such as indicator NQF 0471 from the Child Core Set.

(III) Prenatal care received by youth, including, but not limited to, date of initiation of prenatal care by trimester, frequency of service delivery, and type of provider of care, such
 as indicator NQF 1517 from the Child Core Set.

(IV) Postnatal care received by youth, including, but not limited to, frequency, type of service delivery, and type of provider of care.

(V) The total number and rate of youth who received contraceptive counseling, initiated contraception, and contraception method selected, such as indicators NQF 2902, 2903, and 2904 from the Child Core Set.

(VI) Testing and treatment for sexually transmitted infection in youth, such as indicator NQF 0033 from the Child Core Set or Chlamydia Screening in Women Ages 16-20 (CHL-CH) from HEDIS.

(VII) Frequency with which treatment of youth for sexually transmitted infection was followed by testing the same youth for reinfection within a one- to six-month time span.

(VIII) Receipt of annual wellness exam, such as Adolescent Well-Care Visits (AWC) from HEDIS, and frequency with which a general health exam or annual exam was paired with contraceptive counseling, pregnancy testing, sexually transmitted infection testing, or contraceptive initiation.

(iii) Outcome data shall be disaggregated and reported by age, race, ethnicity, sexual orientation, gender identity, county, and county placement type, if possible.

(iv) Outcome data shall be reported in a way that does not identify individual youth and complies with all applicable state and federal confidentiality and privacy laws and regulations.

(2) The department shall consult the working group convened pursuant to subdivision (e) in the selection of additional
 performance and outcome data categories and measures to include in the report and in the development of the report framework. Every three years, or earlier if needed, the department shall consult the State Department of Health Care Services and the State Department of Public Health and revise measures, if necessary.

(3) The report shall be completed annually, commencing on January 1, 2023, and shall be posted on the department’s internet website in a manner that is publicly accessible.

(4) For the purposes of this subdivision, “youth” means foster youth 10 years of age and older and nonminor dependents.

(k) The department shall adopt regulations to implement this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 696, Sec. 25.   (AB 172)   Effective October 8, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

16521.6.

To ensure that coordinated, timely, and trauma-informed services are provided to children and youth in foster care who have experienced severe trauma, all of the following shall occur:

(a) (1) Each county shall develop and implement a memorandum of understanding setting forth the roles and responsibilities of agencies and other entities that serve children and youth in foster care who have experienced severe trauma. Participants in the development and implementation of the memorandum of understanding shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) The county child welfare agency.

(B) The county probation department.

(C) The county behavioral health departments.

(D) The county office of education.

(E) The regional center or centers that serve children and youth with developmental disabilities in the county.

(F) Foster care or other child welfare advocacy groups, as deemed appropriate by the organizations that will be parties to the memorandum, serving in an advisory capacity.

(2) The memorandum of understanding shall include, at a minimum, provisions addressing all of the following:

(A) Establishment and operation of an interagency leadership team.

(B) Establishment and operation of an interagency placement committee, as defined in Section 4096.

(C) Commitment to implementation of an integrated core practice model.

(D) Processes for screening, assessment, and entry to care.

(E) Processes for child and family teaming and universal service planning.

(F) Alignment and coordination of transportation and other foster youth services.

(G) Recruitment and management of resource families and delivery of therapeutic foster care services.

(H) Information and data sharing agreements.

(I) Staff recruitment, training, and coaching.

(J) Financial resource management and cost sharing.

(K) Dispute resolution.

(L) Processes, as developed through tribal consultation with the federally recognized tribes within each county, for engaging and coordinating with these tribes in the ongoing implementation of the memorandums of understanding described in this section. 

(3) (A) No later than October 1, 2021, members of the interagency leadership team,
 or its designees, shall establish a process to provide, arrange for, or ensure the provision of, at least six months of family-based aftercare service to children and youth, as described in Section 4096.6, and acknowledgment that federal financial participation under the Medi-Cal program is only available if all state and federal requirements are met and the service is medically necessary.

(B) Members of the interagency leadership team described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2), or its designees,